Utah statutes.
16-6a-107.   Fees.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, the division shall charge and
collect a fee for services established by the division in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504 including fees:
(a)  for furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper
relating to a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation; and
(b)  for the certificate and affixing the seal to a certified copy described
in Subsection (1)(a).
(2) (a)  The division shall provide expedited, 24-hour processing of any item
under this section upon request.
(b)  The division shall charge and collect additional fees established by the
division in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for expedited service provided
under Subsection (2)(a).
(3) (a)  The division shall charge and collect a fee determined by the
division in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 at the time of any service of
process on the director of the division as resident agent of a domestic or
foreign nonprofit corporation.
(b)  The fee paid under Subsection (3)(a) may be recovered as taxable costs by
the party to the suit or action causing the service to be made if the party
prevails in the suit or action.
